test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-32veri_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - veri: # Noun (32) veri 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     veri+N+Sg+Nom: veri
     veri+N+Sg+Gen: vere
     veri+N+Sg+Par: verd
     veri+N+Sg+Ill: verri
     veri+N+Sg+Ine: [veren, vereh, verehn]
     veri+N+Sg+Ela: verest
     veri+N+Sg+All: verele
     veri+N+Sg+Ade: verel
     veri+N+Sg+Abl: verelt
     veri+N+Sg+Tra: veres
     veri+N+Sg+Ter: vereniq
     veri+N+Sg+Abe: vereldäq
     veri+N+Sg+Com: veregaq
     veri+N+Pl+Nom: vereq
     veri+N+Pl+Gen: verri
     veri+N+Pl+Par: verri
     veri+N+Pl+Ill: [verrihe, verri, verride]
     veri+N+Pl+Ine: [verin, verih, verihn, verrin, verrih,  verrihn]
     veri+N+Pl+Ela: [verist, verrist]
     veri+N+Pl+All: [verile, verrile]
     veri+N+Pl+Ade: [veril, verril]
     veri+N+Pl+Abl: [verilt, verrilt]
     veri+N+Pl+Tra: [veris, verris]
     veri+N+Pl+Ter: [veriniq, verriniq]
     veri+N+Pl+Abe: [verildäq, verrildäq]
     veri+N+Pl+Com: verrigaq
